Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.100

How money or property applied by sheriff.

Unless a receiver has been appointed or extended with respect to money or property in the hands of the sheriff, the judge may direct the sheriff to apply the money, the property, or the proceeds of the property, upon an execution in favor of the judgment creditor issued either before or after the payment or delivery to the sheriff.

[ 2004 c 165 s 34; 1893 c 133 s 10; RRS s 622.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.